Vermont statutes. Title 16 Education
Article 2. Organization and Operation

§ 706.
Proposal to form study committee.

When the boards of two or more school districts believe that a study committee should be established to study the advisability of forming a union school district, or if five percent of the voters eligible to vote at the last annual or special school district meeting petition the board of their respective school districts to do so, each of the boards shall meet with the superintendent of each participating district. With the advice of the superintendent, the boards shall establish a budget and shall fix the number of persons to serve on the study committee that prepares the report required by this subchapter. The boards’ proposal shall ensure that each participating district share in the committee’s budget and be represented on the committee in that proportion that the equalized pupils (as defined in section 4001 of this title) of the district bear to the total equalized pupils of all school districts intending to participate in the committee’s study. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit informal exploration between and among school districts prior to the formation of a study committee.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

1997, No. 71

(Adj. Sess.), § 109, eff. March 11, 1998;

2005, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 21.

§ 706a.
Approval of study budget; appointment of study committee.

If the proposed budget established in section 706 of this chapter exceeds $25,000.00, then:

The voters of each participating district shall be warned to meet at an annual or special school district meeting to vote on a question in substantially the following form: “Shall the school district of . . . . . . . . appropriate funds necessary to support the district’s financial share of a study to determine the advisability of forming a union school district with some or all of the following school districts: . . . . . . . . ? It is estimated that the district’s share, if all the above-listed districts vote to participate, will be $ . . . . . . . . . The total proposed budget, to be shared by all participating districts, is $ . . . . . . . . .” It is not necessary for the voters of each participating district to vote on the same date to establish a union school district study committee.

If the vote is in the affirmative in two or more districts, the boards of the participating districts shall appoint a study committee consisting of the number of persons previously fixed. At least one school director from each participating district shall be on the committee. A district board may appoint residents to the committee who are not school directors.

The sums expended for study purposes under this section shall be considered a part of the approved cost of any project in which the district participates pursuant to sections 3447 through 3449 of this title.

If the proposed budget established in section 706 of this chapter does not exceed $25,000.00, then the boards of the participating districts shall appoint a study committee consisting of the number of persons previously fixed. At least one school director from each participating district shall be on the committee. A district board may appoint residents who are not school directors to the committee. The sums expended for study purposes under this section shall be considered a part of the approved cost of any project in which the district participates pursuant to sections 3447 through 3449 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 7; amended

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 22.

§ 706b.
Study committee; contents of study committee report.

Study committee. When a study committee is appointed, the members shall elect a chair who shall notify the Secretary of Education of the appointment. The Secretary shall cooperate with the study committee and may make Agency staff available to assist in the study of the proposed union school district. The committee is a public body pursuant to

1 V.S.A. § 310(3)

. The committee shall cease to exist when the clerk of each district voting on a proposal to establish a union school district has certified the results of the vote to the Secretary pursuant to section 706g of this chapter.

Decision and report. The study committee may determine that it is inadvisable to form a union school district, or it may prepare a report in the form of an agreement between member districts for the government of the proposed union school district. In making its determination, the committee may contact additional school districts it believes may be advisable to include within a new union school district. If the committee decides to recommend formation of a union school district, its report shall specify:

The names of school districts the committee considers necessary to the establishment of the proposed union; provided, however, only districts named in the warning for the vote under section 706a of this chapter may be identified as necessary.

The names of additional school districts the committee considers advisable to include in the proposed union school district.

The grades to be operated by the proposed union school district.

The cost and general location of any proposed new schools to be constructed and the cost and general description of any proposed renovations.

A plan for the first year of the union school district’s operation for the transportation of students, the assignment of staff, and curriculum that is consistent with existing contracts, collective bargaining agreements, or other provisions of law. The board of the union school district shall make all subsequent decisions regarding transportation, staff, and curriculum subject to existing contracts, collective bargaining agreements, or other provisions of law.

The indebtedness of proposed member districts that the union school district shall assume.

The specific pieces of real property of proposed member districts that the union shall acquire, their valuation, and how the union school district shall pay for them.

The allocation of capital and operating expenses of the union school district among the member districts.

Consistent with the proportional representation requirements of the Equal Protection Clause of the U.S. Constitution, the method of apportioning the representation that each proposed member district shall have on the union school board. The union school board shall have no more than 18 members, and each member district shall be entitled to at least one representative.

The term of office of directors initially elected, to be arranged so that one-third expire on the day of the second annual meeting of the respective districts, one-third on the day of the third annual meeting of the respective districts, and one-third on the day of the fourth annual meeting of the respective districts, or as near to that proportion as possible.

The date on which the union school district proposal will be submitted to the voters.

The date on which the union school district will begin operating schools and providing educational services.

Any other matters that the committee considers pertinent, including whether votes on the union school district budget or public questions shall be by Australian ballot.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 8; amended

1973, No. 2

, § 1;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 23;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 83, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 706c.
Consideration by local school district boards and approval by State Board of Education.

If a study committee prepares a report under section 706b of this chapter, the committee shall transmit the report to the school boards of each school district that participated in the study committee and any other school districts that the report identifies as necessary or advisable to the establishment of the proposed union school district for the review and comment of each school board.

The study committee shall transmit the report to the Secretary who shall submit the report with his or her recommendations to the State Board. After providing notice to the study committee and after giving the committee an opportunity to be heard, the State Board shall consider the report and the Secretary’s recommendations and decide whether the formation of such union school district will be in the best interests of the State, the students, and the school districts proposed to be members of the union. The State Board may request that the Secretary and the study committee make further investigation and may consider any other information deemed by it to be pertinent. If, after due consideration and any further meetings it deems necessary, the State Board finds that the formation of the proposed union school district is in the best interests of the State, the students, and the school districts, it shall approve the report submitted by the committee, together with any amendments, as a final report of the study committee, and shall give notice of its action to the committee. The chair of the study committee shall file a copy of the final report with the town clerk of each proposed member district at least 20 days prior to the vote to establish the union.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 9; amended

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 24;

2011, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 84, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 706d.
Vote to establish union school districts.

Each school district that is designated in the final report as necessary to the proposed union school district shall vote, and any school district designated in the final report as advisable to be included may vote on the establishment of the proposed union school district. The vote shall be held on the date specified in the final report. The vote shall be warned in each proposed member school district by the school board of that district, and the vote shall be by Australian ballot at separate school district meetings held on the same day and during the same hours. The polls shall remain open at least eight hours. Early or absentee voting as provided by

17 V.S.A. §§ 2531

to 2550 shall be permitted. The meetings shall be warned as a special meeting of each school district voting on the proposal. The school board of a school district designated as “advisable” in the proposed union school district may choose not to hold a meeting to vote on the question of establishing the union school district; provided, however, it shall warn and conduct the meeting on application of ten percent of the voters in the school district.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 10; amended

1987, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 19;

2001, No. 6

, § 12(c), eff. April 10, 2001;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 25.

§ 706e.
Election of directors.

Each school district, at the meetings warned to vote on establishment of the union, shall also elect directors by Australian ballot to represent the district on the union school board in the event the union is approved by the voters. Directors so elected shall serve from the date of the organization meeting for terms as provided in the final report.

Nominations for the office of union school director representing any district shall be made by filing with the clerk of that school district proposed as a member of the union, a statement of nomination signed by at least 30 voters in that district or one percent of the legal voters in the district, whichever is less and accepted in writing by the nominee. A statement shall be filed not less than 30 nor more than 40 days prior to the date of the vote. Each person so nominated shall have his or her name placed on the ballot. Each district shall elect as many directors as it is then entitled to have represent it on the union school board. The candidates for directors receiving the largest numbers of votes shall be elected to the union school board. In the event of a tie that, if unbroken, will result in more directors being elected than a district is entitled to, the town board of school directors shall, by majority vote, cast one vote for one of the candidates tied and so create a plurality for that candidate. Nothing contained in this subchapter shall be construed to prohibit the election of school directors by at-large voting.

Nominations for the office of a union school director at-large shall be for a person who is a resident of a school district that is proposed as necessary to the establishment of the union. The nomination shall be made by filing with the clerk of any of the school districts proposed as necessary to the establishment of the union not less than 30 nor more than 40 days prior to the date of the vote, a statement of nomination signed by at least 60 voters from one or more districts proposed as necessary to the establishment of the union. Upon receipt of a petition for an at-large union school director, a clerk shall place the name of the person on the ballot and shall notify each clerk of every other school district proposed as a member of the union that the person is to have his or her name placed on each ballot in each district. Each district shall vote on candidates for member at-large. The candidates receiving the largest number of votes shall be elected to the union school board.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 11; amended

1971, No. 11

;

1975, No. 48

, § 7, eff. April 15, 1975;

1999, No. 64

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 3, 2000;

2003, No. 36

, § 6.

§ 706f.
Contents of warning on vote to establish the union.

The warning for each school district meeting shall contain two articles in substantially the following form:

WARNING The voters of the town (city, union, etc.) school district of
are hereby notified and warned to meet at
on the
day of
,
, to vote by Australian ballot between the hours of
, at which time the polls will open, and, at which time the polls will close, upon the following articles of business: Article I Shall the town (city, union, etc.) school district of
, which the State Board of Education has found (necessary or advisable) to include in the proposed union school district, join with the school districts of
and
, which the State Board of Education has found necessary to include in the proposed union school district, and the school districts of
and
, which the State Board of Education has found advisable to include in the proposed union school district, for the purpose of forming a union school district, as provided in Title 16, Vermont Statutes Annotated, upon the following conditions and agreements: (a) The union school district shall operate and manage a school offering instruction in grades through
. (b) (State formula by which representation of each member district on the union school board is to be determined.) (c) [Repealed.] (d) The union school district shall assume the indebtedness of member districts, acquire the school properties of member districts, and pay for them, all as specified in the final report. (If no indebtedness is to be assumed, or school property acquired, by the union district, this paragraph (d) may be omitted.) (e) The provisions of the final report approved by the State Board of Education on the
day of
,
, which is on file in the town clerk’s office, shall govern the union district. Article II To elect from the following nominees:
,
, (name, etc.),
(number of directors that the district is entitled to) school director(s) to serve on the proposed union school district board from the date of the organization meeting for terms as provided in the final report.

Click to view

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 12; amended

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 15;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 26;

2009, No. 44

, § 10, eff. May 21, 2009.

§ 706g.
Designation of districts as union school district, recording by Secretary of State.

Within 45 days after the vote or 15 days after an unsuccessful vote to reconsider or rescind the original vote under

17 V.S.A. § 2661

, whichever is later, the clerk of each district voting on the proposal to establish a union school district shall certify the results of the vote to the Secretary of Education. If a majority of the voters voting in each district that is designated in the final report as necessary to the establishment of the proposed union vote to establish the proposed union district, those districts, together with any district designated in the final report as advisable to be included in the proposed union, that voted by a majority of those voting to establish the proposed union district shall constitute a union school district. The Secretary of Education shall designate all such districts as a union school district and shall so certify to the Secretary of State, who shall record such certification. Upon this record, the union school district shall become a body politic and corporate with the powers incident to a municipal corporation, shall be known by the name or number given in the certificate, by that name or number may sue and be sued, and may hold and convey real and personal estate for the use of the district. The record shall be notice to all parties of the establishment of the union school district with all the powers incident to such a district as provided in this subchapter. A certified copy of the record in the Office of the Secretary of State shall be filed by him or her in the office of the clerk of each school district to be included within the union school district within 15 days from the date the Secretary of Education certified the existence of the union district to him or her. This filing shall be prima facie evidence of full compliance with the requirements for the creation of a union school district as set forth in this subchapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 13; amended

2013, No. 56

, § 1, eff. May 30, 2013;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 66.

§ 706h.
Superintendent for union district.

For administrative and supervisory services, the State Board of Education shall assign a union school district to a supervisory union as established according to the provisions of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 706i.
Organization meeting; notice.

Within 60 days after the copies of the certificate have been filed in the office of the clerk of each school district to be included as members of the union school district, the voters in the union district shall hold an organization meeting within the district. Notice of the day, hour, and place of the meeting shall be posted in at least one public place in each member school district of the union school district and published once in a newspaper circulating in the union district. Publication and posting shall be made not more than 40 days nor less than 30 days before the date of the meeting. The warning for such meeting shall be drawn by the Secretary or by such person or persons who are voters in the union school district as the Secretary may designate for the purpose. The cost of giving notice shall be borne by the union school district.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 15; amended

1971, No. 4

, eff. March 19, 1971;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 86, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 706j.
Organization meeting; business to be transacted.

The meeting shall be called to order by the Secretary or a person designated by the Secretary, and at such meeting or at an adjournment thereof:

A temporary presiding officer and clerk from among the qualified voters shall be elected.

The meeting shall adopt Robert’s or other rules of order, which shall govern the parliamentary procedures of this and subsequent meetings of the union school district.

A moderator, a clerk, a treasurer, and three auditors shall be elected; a treasurer shall be elected unless a supervisory union treasurer is designated to act as treasurer of the union district.

Compensation to be paid district officers shall be determined and approved.

The date of the annual meeting shall be not earlier than February 1 nor later than June 1.

The date on which the union will assume control of existing schools of the class specified in the vote to establish the union shall be determined.

Provision shall be made for the payment of any expense incurred or to be incurred by or on behalf of the district for the period between the date on which the vote was taken to form the union district and the first annual meeting of the union district, including the cost of architects, surveyors, contractors, attorneys, educational consultants or other experts, the purchase price of a site for a union school, and current operating expenses.

The board of directors may be authorized by the electorate to borrow money pending receipt of payments from the Education Fund by the issuance of its notes or orders payable not later than one year from date. A newly formed union school district, however, is authorized to borrow sufficient funds to meet pending obligations.

Any other business, the subject matter of which has been included in the warning, that the voters have power to transact at any annual meeting, may be transacted.

The officers and directors as elected shall be sworn in before entering upon the duties of their offices, and a record made by the clerk. They shall assume office upon being sworn in. Officers shall serve until the first annual meeting or until their successors are elected and qualified. When there is only one nominee for temporary presiding officer, temporary clerk, moderator, clerk, treasurer, or auditor, the voters may, by acclamation, instruct an officer to elect the nominee by casting one ballot, and upon the ballot being cast, the nominee shall be legally elected and shall thereupon be sworn.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 16; amended

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1971, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.);

1973, No. 2

, § 2;

1977, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2006;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 27;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 87, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 706k.
Election of district officers.

A school director representing a member district who is to serve on the union school district board after the expiration of the terms provided for school directors in the final report shall be elected by that member district at an annual or special meeting. Such election shall be by Australian ballot in those member districts that so elect their town school district directors. Union district officers elected at an annual meeting shall enter upon their duties on July 1 following their election and shall serve a term of one year or until their successors are elected and qualified, except that if the voters at an annual meeting so vote, moderators elected at an annual meeting shall assume office upon election and shall serve for a term of one year or until their successors are elected and qualified. School directors elected at an annual meeting shall assume office upon election and shall serve a term of three years or until their successors are elected and qualified. The clerk of the union district shall, within ten days after the election or appointment of any officer or director, give notice of the results to the Secretary of State.

In any member district that elects its representative directors to the union school district board, or other union district officers, by Australian ballot, statements of nomination for officers to be elected by Australian ballot shall be signed by at least 30 voters in that district or one percent of the legal voters in the district, whichever is less. The statement of nomination shall be accepted in writing by the nominee. The statement shall be filed with the clerk of the town school district no later than 5:00 p.m. on the sixth Monday preceding the day of the election.

In a union district that elects one or more at-large directors by Australian ballot, a nomination shall be made by filing a statement of nomination signed by at least 60 voters from one or more member districts with the clerk of the union school district no later than 5:00 p.m. on the sixth Monday preceding the day of the election.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 17; amended

1973, No. 2

, § 3;

1975, No. 48

, § 8, eff. April 15, 1975;

1991, No. 12

;

1999, No. 64

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Feb. 3, 2000;

2003, No. 36

, § 7.

§ 706
l
.
Vacancies in district offices.

A vacancy occurring in any district office other than on the board of directors shall be temporarily filled by the board of school directors of the union school district as soon as practicable after the vacancy occurs and the temporary appointee shall serve until the district, at its next meeting, fills the vacancy for the remainder of the unexpired term.

When a vacancy occurs on the board of directors:

If the member represented a member school district, the clerk shall immediately notify the school board of the member district. Within 30 days of the receipt of that notice, the school board shall appoint a person who is otherwise eligible to serve as a director from that district to fill the vacancy until an election at a special or annual district meeting is held.

If the member represented a town that does not have a school board, the clerk shall immediately notify the selectboard of the town. Within 30 days of the receipt of that notice, the selectboard shall appoint a person who is otherwise eligible to serve as a director from that district to fill the vacancy until an election at a special or annual district meeting is held.

If the member was elected at large to represent the entire union district, the union school board shall, within 30 days of the creation of the vacancy, appoint a person who is otherwise eligible to serve as a director to fill the vacancy until an election at a special or annual district meeting is held.

If there are vacancies in a majority of the members of the board of directors at the same time, the remaining director or directors are authorized to draw orders for payment of continuing obligations and necessary expenses until a majority of the vacancies is filled. If there are no directors in office, the Secretary of State shall appoint and authorize the union school district clerk or other qualified person to draw orders for payment of continuing obligations and necessary expenses until a majority of the vacancies is filled.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 18; amended

1975, No. 171

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2005, No. 32

, § 2.

§ 706m.
Terms of office.

The terms of office of directors shall be three years after the first term and of all other officers shall be one year.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 19; amended

2005, No. 54

, § 6;

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. July 1, 2013.

§ 706n.
Amendments to agreements reached by establishment vote, organization meeting, or final report.

A specific condition or agreement set forth as a distinct subsection under Article 1 of the warning required by section 706f of this chapter and adopted by the member districts at the vote held to establish the union school district, or any amendment subsequently adopted pursuant to the terms of this section, may be amended only at a special or annual union district meeting, provided that the prior approval of the State Board of Education shall be secured if the proposed amendment concerns reducing the number of grades that the union is to operate. The warning for the meeting shall contain each proposed amendment as a separate article. The vote on each proposed amendment shall be by Australian ballot. Ballots shall be counted in each member district, and the clerks of each member district shall transmit the results of the vote in that district to the union school district clerk. Although the results shall be reported to the public by member district, an amendment is effective if approved by a majority of the electorate of the union district voting at that meeting.

Any decision at the organization meeting may be amended by a majority of those present and voting at a union district meeting duly warned for that purpose.

Any provision of the final report that was included in the warning required pursuant to section 706f of this chapter for the vote to form the union by reference to or incorporation of the entire report but that was not set forth as a distinct subsection under Article 1 of the warning may be amended by a simple majority vote of the union board of school directors or by any other majority of the board as is specified for a particular matter in the report.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2003, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. July 1, 2006;

2007, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 28;

2011, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 19.

§ 706
o
.
Statistical information.

Annually, on or before August 15, the directors shall give or cause to be given to the Secretary of Education answers to statistical inquiries that may be addressed to the district by the Secretary.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 21; amended

1971, No. 10

;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 88, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 706p.
Warnings of union district meetings.

Union district meetings shall be warned by the clerk, or in the case of his or her disability, by the directors, by posting a notice, signed by the chair of the board or a board member designated by him or her, specifying the time, place, and business of the meeting, in at least one public place in each member school district of the union school district, and causing the same to be published once in a newspaper circulating in the union district. Publication and posting shall be made at least 30 days and not more than 40 days before the meeting, not counting the day of the meeting. The warning shall be recorded in the office of the clerk before being posted.

Any meeting called for the purpose of considering a bond issue shall be warned in accordance with the provisions of

24 V.S.A. § 1755

.

The board of directors shall have the same authority and obligation to warn or call meetings of the union school district as selectboard members have to warn or call town meetings.

When a person whose duty it is to warn a district meeting neglects to do so for ten days after application is made as provided in this section, he or she shall forfeit to the district $20.00 for each ten days’ neglect, to be recovered in an action on this statute.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 22; amended

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 72(a),(c);

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 67.

§ 706q.
Powers, duties, and liabilities of officers; bonds.

The powers, duties, and liabilities of the treasurer, board of directors, and clerk shall be like those of a treasurer, board of school directors, and clerk of a town school district.

Before entering upon the duties of their office, the board of school directors shall give a blanket bond and the treasurer shall give a personal bond to the district, conditioned upon the faithful performance of their duties. The treasurer’s bond shall be in such sum as the board of school directors shall require. The board of school directors’ bond shall be in such sum as shall be required by the Secretary of Education. When a board of school directors or treasurer for 10 days neglects to give a bond as required, the office shall become vacant.

The board of directors shall prepare an annual report concerning the affairs of the union district and have it printed and distributed to the legal voters of the union at least ten days prior to the annual union district meeting. The report shall be filed with the clerk of the union district and the town clerk of each member district. It shall include:

a statement of the board concerning the affairs of the union district;

the budget proposed for the next year;

a statement of the superintendent of schools for the union district concerning the affairs of the union; and

a treasurer’s report.

[Repealed.]

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 23; amended

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2003, No. 107

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 26, 27, eff. July 1, 2013;

2013, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 89, eff. Feb. 14, 2014.

§ 706r.
Moderator.

The moderator shall preside at district meetings and in his or her absence a moderator pro tempore shall be chosen to preside.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.

§ 706s.
Books and papers to be turned over to successor.

When a district office becomes vacant, and a successor is elected or appointed, the successor is entitled to receive all of the books and papers of the office, on demand.
A person having books or papers in his or her possession who refuses for ten days after demand to surrender the same to the successor shall forfeit to the district $20.00 for each ten days’ neglect, to be recovered in an action on this statute.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 25.

§ 706t.
Repealed.
1969, No. 298 (Adj. Sess.), § 79.

§ 706u.
Checklist for union district meetings.

The clerks of the respective towns within the union school district shall furnish to the clerk of the district, at the expense of the district, authenticated copies of the checklist of legal voters within the town, as the same appears after revision of the checklist made pursuant to

17 V.S.A. §§ 2141-2150

. In the case of a person who is otherwise eligible to vote at a union district meeting who has not maintained current residence in a member town for the requisite number of days, but who has resided within the union school district for the requisite number of days, the clerk of the town of current residence shall enter such person’s name on the checklist upon presentation of a certificate, or certificates, signed by the clerks of the towns of former residence evidencing residence within the district for the requisite number of days.
That checklist shall control for the purposes of determining the voters eligible to vote at the district meeting, except that at an assembled district meeting, the union board of directors shall decide all questions as to the eligibility of a person to vote.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 27; amended

1969, No. 298

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1987, No. 228

(Adj. Sess.), § 20.

§ 706v.
Record of proceedings.

The clerk shall keep a record of the votes and the proceedings of the union school district meetings and give certified copies of them when required.
A clerk who neglects to perform this duty shall forfeit $20.00 to the district, to be recovered in an action on this statute.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 28.

§ 706w.
Polling places; transportation and counting of ballots.

Bond issues under

24 V.S.A. §§ 1751-1788

are to be determined by Australian ballot or voting machine; each regular polling place in each district shall be used for this purpose.
The board of civil authority of each town within the union district shall be responsible for determining the eligibility of persons to vote, the supervision of the election, and the transportation of ballots in its district to a central point designated by the board of school directors. The ballots shall be commingled.
Counting of ballots by representatives of the boards of civil authority of the member towns shall be supervised by the union district clerk or his or her designee.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 277

(Adj. Sess.), § 29; amended

1989, No. 211

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 707.
Union school district boards; quorum and voting requirements.

A union school district board meeting shall be conducted in accordance with the Vermont Open Meeting Law.

A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum. Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this section but notwithstanding any other provision of law, the concurrence of a majority of members present at a union school district board meeting shall be necessary and sufficient for board action.

A union school district may establish a system of weighted voting in its school board to reflect the principle of one person, one vote. If weighted voting is used, members of the board holding a majority of the total number of weighted votes shall constitute a quorum, and a majority of the weighted votes cast shall be necessary and sufficient for board action.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 181

(Adj. Sess.), § 14.